Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20254-209
Organization acting as agent; compliance required.

For an agent of a foreign principal from an adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization that is not an individual, each officer or director of such agent or person performing the functions of an officer or a director shall cause such agent to execute and file a registration statement and supplements to such statement as and when such filing is required under section 4-204 and shall also cause such agent to comply with sections 4-206 and 4-207 and all other requirements of the Foreign Adversary and Terrorist Agent Registration Act. Dissolution of any organization acting as an agent of a foreign principal from an adversary nation or a foreign terrorist organization shall not relieve any such agent from complying with this section. In case of the failure of any such agent to comply with any of the requirements of the act, each of such agent's officers, directors, or persons performing the functions of officers or directors shall be subject to prosecution under the act.

Laws 2025, LB644, § 9.